Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 342.940, as amended by section 31, chapter 95, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
342.940. [(1) As used in this section and ORS 342.943, “educator” means a person who is: ]
[(a) A teacher, an administrator or another school employee who is  employed to provide instruction
or support to students in early childhood education or in kindergarten through grade 12; or ]
[(b) Entering into or enrolled in an educator preparation program. ]
[(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council shall be established and function under an  intergov-
ernmental agreement, pursuant to ORS 190.003 to 190.130, between  state agencies and one or more
school districts and education service districts. The state agencies that must be parties  to the inter-
governmental agreement are the Department of Education, the Department of  Early Learning and Care,
the Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission and the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission.]
[(b) The purposes of the council are to provide resources related  to educator professional learning
and to provide other educator supports. ]
[(3) The intergovernmental agreement  establishing the council shall outline the governance frame-
work and the administrative details necessary  for the efficient and effective implementation of the duties
of the council. ]
[(4)(a) The council shall consist of: ]
[(A) Members who are representatives of the parties  to the intergovernmental agreement establish-
ing the council. ]
[(B) No  more than 10 members who are practicing educators, classified staff in a public school or
for an education service district, early learning providers and professionals and school district  board
members.]
[(C) No more than 10 members who are representatives of educator  preparation providers,
education-focused nonprofit  organizations, education-focused philanthropic organizations, professional
education associations,  community-based education organizations that represent families and students,
post-secondary institutions of education and federally recognized Indian tribes of this state. ]
[(b) Subject  to any limits designated as provided by the intergovernmental agreement establishing
the council, the majority of the members of the council identified under paragraph  (a) of this subsection
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 1
may propose additional members of the council. The inclusion of  additional members on the council
shall be subject to the procedures established by the council under the intergovernmental agreement. ]
[(5) The council shall: ]
[(a) Establish  a system of educator networks, as described in ORS 342.943, by which every educa-
tor in this state has access to professional learning opportunities; ]
[(b) Administer the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program under  ORS 329.788
to 329.820;]
[(c) Coordinate the distribution of moneys  to educator networks from the Educator Advancement
Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks; ]
[(d) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications within and among the networks to
improve teaching and learning; and ]
[(e) Continuously assess the needs of educators in this state and coordinate  priorities based on the
moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund. ]
[(6) The  Department of  Education shall provide support to the strategic direction of  the council
by:]
[(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor: ]
[(A) Teaching and learning conditions; ]
[(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and ]
[(C) Common  outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching and
learning.]
[(b) Assisting the council  in coordinating and connecting educator networks, supporting profes-
sional learning priorities, enabling access to professional learning  and supports, leveraging funding
sources and managing innovation funds. ]
[(c) Recommending statutory  and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of the coun-
cil.]
[(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act. ]
[(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing: ]
[(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and ]
[(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators to work in high-need schools and  in practice
areas with a shortage of educators. ]
[(f) Identifying high-leverage  educator practices to be developed by educators throughout their ca-
reers.]
[(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council: ]
[(A) Gives preference, when making recommendations about  funding distributions, to entities that
have demonstrated success in improving student indicators. ]
[(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit of all regions of this state when establishing
the system of educator networks. ]
[(C) Works toward improving student progress indicators identified by the  Department of Educa-
tion or set forth in ORS 350.014. ]
[(D) Includes and connects  education providers and leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary education.]
[(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council. ]
[(i) Developing a system that allows for  the statewide dissemination of emerging practices and
evidence-based models.]
[(j) Providing technical assistance to the council, including  online systems for sharing professional
learning resources and supporting educator networks. ]
[(k) Administering the distribution of grant  and contract funds for programs described in this
section.]
[(L) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including: ]
[(A) Making recommendations to the council about  the selection of the sponsors of educator net-
works; ]
[(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and ]
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 2
[(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution of  funds to educator
networks.]
[(7)(a) The State Board of Education and the  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may
adopt any rules necessary at the request of the council to support the council or to perform  any duties
assigned to the board or commission under this section. ]
[(b) The council may adopt  rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 for the purposes of ORS 329.788
to 329.820 and 342.943. ]
[(8) The council shall be considered a board for purposes of ORS chapter 180. ]
(1) As used in this section and ORS 342.943, “educator” means a person who is:
(a) A teacher,  an administrator or another school employee who is employed to provide
instruction or  support to students in early childhood education or in kindergarten through
grade 12; or
(b) Entering into or enrolled in an educator preparation program.
(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council is established for the purpose of:
(A) Providing resources related to educator professional learning and other educator
supports.
(B) Convening a coalition of  education stakeholders to align, coordinate and improve a
statewide system of professional development and support for educators.
(b) The council shall consist of 19 members appointed as follows:
(A) The Department  of Education, Department of Early Learning and Care, Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission and Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall each
appoint one representative to serve as a standing member. A standing member shall serve
a term of four years  at the pleasure of the appointing authority and is eligible for reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy  for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective. A standing member may designate  another
individual to, in the absence of the standing member, act on behalf of the  standing member.
(B) Following appointment of the standing members under subparagraph (A) of this par-
agraph, the standing members shall appoint 15 rotating members as follows:
(i) One elementary school teacher who is employed by a school district.
(ii) One middle school teacher who is employed by a school district.
(iii) One high school teacher who is employed by a school district.
(iv) One classified staff member  who is employed by a school district or an education
service district.
(v) Two educators who serve students in prekindergarten through grade 12 and  are em-
ployed by a school district or an education service district.
(vi) One school administrator who is employed by a school district.
(vii) One superintendent of a school district.
(viii) One superintendent of an education service district.
(ix) One member of a school district board.
(x) One early learning provider or professional.
(xi) One representative of an approved educator preparation program, as defined  in ORS
342.120, located in Oregon.
(xii) One representative of a professional educator association.
(xiii) One  representative of a nonprofit organization focused on educational equity for
students and families.
(xiv) One representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(c) Rotating members shall serve for terms of two years and shall be eligible  for reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the standing members shall make an  ap-
pointment that becomes  immediately effective for the unexpired term. A rotating member
may designate another individual to, in  the absence of the rotating member, act on behalf
of the rotating member.
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 3
(3)(a) A majority of the standing  members and a majority of the rotating members con-
stitute a quorum for the transaction of  business. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, official action by the council requires the approval of a majority of the members.
The council shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson.
(b) Official action by the council on matters related to the allocation or expenditure  of
state funds requires approval of a majority of the standing members only.
(c) In addition to the appointments under subsection (2) of this section, the  council may
appoint nonvoting, ex officio members to serve in an advisory capacity.
(4) The council shall meet at least four times per year  at a time and place specified by
the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members.
(5) Members on the council are not entitled to  compensation, but may be reimbursed for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses  incurred by them in the performance of their
official duties in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
(6) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks, as described in ORS 342.943, by which every
educator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities;
(b) Oversee the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship  program under ORS
329.788 to 329.820;
(c) Coordinate the distribution of moneys to educator networks from the Educator Ad-
vancement Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks;
(d) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications within and among  the
networks to improve teaching and learning; and
(e) Continuously assess the needs of educators in this state and  coordinate priorities
based on the moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund.
(7) The Department of Education shall provide staff support  to the council. Support
provided by the department shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Administering  the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program under
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(b) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
(C) Common outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching
and learning.
(c) Assisting the council in  coordinating and connecting educator networks, supporting
professional learning priorities, enabling access to professional learning and  supports, lever-
aging funding sources and managing innovation funds.
(d) Recommending statutory  and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of
the council.
(e) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(f) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful  recruitment of effective educators to work in high-need schools and
in practice areas with a shortage of educators.
(g) Identifying high-leverage educator practices to be developed by  educators throughout
their careers.
(h) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to en-
tities that have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit  of all regions of this state when
establishing the system of educator networks.
(C) Works toward improving student progress indicators identified by the  Department
of Education or set forth in ORS 350.014.
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 4
(D) Includes and connects education providers and leaders from prekindergarten  through
post-secondary education.
(i) Developing a system that allows for the statewide  dissemination of emerging practices
and evidence-based models.
(j) Providing technical assistance to the council, including online systems  for sharing
professional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
(k) Administering the distribution of grant and contract  funds for programs described in
this section.
(L) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making recommendations to the council about the selection of  the sponsors of edu-
cator networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution  of funds to educator
networks.
(m) Providing other staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
(8)(a) The State Board of  Education, Early Learning Council, Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission and Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may  adopt any rules
necessary at the request of the Educator Advancement Council to carry out this section.
(b) The Educator Advancement Council may adopt rules necessary to carry out  this
section or ORS 329.788 to 329.820 or 342.943.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 342.940 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. (1) The intergovernmental agreement establishing the Educator Advance-
ment Council, entered  into under ORS 342.490 prior to the effective date of this 2025 Act shall
terminate on December 31, 2025.
(2) Upon termination of the  intergovernmental agreement under subsection (1) of this
section, the term of office for  all members of the Educator Advancement Council shall cease.
(3) A member of the council whose term of  office has ceased under subsection (2) of this
section is eligible for reappointment to the council.
(4) On January 1, 2026,  the state agencies described in ORS 342.940 (2)(b)(A) shall each
appoint one representative to serve as a standing member of the council.
(5) On or before January  31, 2026, the standing members appointed to the council under
subsection (4) of this section shall appoint 15 rotating members to the council.
(6) Notwithstanding the term  of office specified in ORS 342.940, of the rotating members
appointed to the council under subsection (5) of this section:
(a) Eight shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2026; and
(b) Seven shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 5
Passed by House February 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3041 (HB 3041-INTRO) Page 6